Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-8243
Centers; categorized.

Designated trauma centers and rehabilitation centers that receive trauma patients shall be categorized according to designation under the Statewide Trauma System Act.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 43;

Laws 1999, LB 594, § 65;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 103;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 113.